Nebraska, session 109, LB43.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
Section 1. Section 70-1001.01, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
70-1001.01 For purposes of sections 70-1001 to 70-1028.02, unless the
context otherwise requires:
(1) Board means the Nebraska Power Review Board;
(2) Commercial electric vehicle charging station means equipment designed
to provide electricity for a fee for the charging of an electric vehicle or a
plug-in hybrid electric vehicle, including an electric vehicle direct-current
charger or a super-fast charger, any successor technology, and all components
thereof. Commercial electric vehicle charging station does not include the
residence of a person where an electric vehicle or a plug-in hybrid electric
vehicle is charged if no customer usage fee is charged;
(3) Commercial electric vehicle charging station operator means a person,
partnership, corporation, or other business entity or political subdivision
that operates a commercial electric vehicle charging station;
(4) Direct-current, fast-charging station means a publicly available
charging system capable of delivering at least fifty kilowatts of direct-
current electrical power to an electric vehicle's rechargeable battery at a
voltage of two hundred volts or greater;
(5) Direct-current, fast-charging station operator means a person,
partnership, corporation, or other business entity that operates a direct-
current, fast-charging station open to the public. The term does not include an
electric supplier or a political subdivision;
(6) Electric supplier or supplier of electricity means any legal entity
supplying, producing, or distributing electricity within the state for sale at
wholesale or retail. Electric supplier does not include a commercial electric
vehicle charging station operator that is a private person or privately owned
partnership, privately owned corporation, or other privately owned business;
(7) Electronic-related means relating to electronic devices, circuits, or
similar systems, or the components of such electronic devices, circuits, or
similar systems, that require electrical currents or electromagnetism to
operate;
(8) Foreign adversary means a foreign government or foreign nongovernment
person determined to be a foreign adversary pursuant to 15 C.F.R. 791.4, as
such regulation existed on February 7, 2025;
(9) (7) Military installation means: a military base other than a National
Guard base where fixed-wing aircraft or strategic weapon assets are on a
permanent or temporary basis assigned, stored, operated from, or otherwise
located;
(a) A United States Air Force ballistic missile silo located within the
geographic area described in 31 C.F.R. 802.211(b)(3), as such regulation
existed on January 1, 2025; or
(b) A United States Air Force base described in 31 C.F.R. 802.227(c), as
such regulation existed on January 1, 2025;
(10) (8) Plug-in hybrid electric vehicle has the same meaning as in
section 60-345.01;
(11) (9) Private electric supplier means an electric supplier producing
electricity from a privately developed renewable energy generation facility
that is not a public power district, a public power and irrigation district, a
municipality, a registered group of municipalities, an electric cooperative, an
electric membership association, any other governmental entity, or any
combination thereof. A private electric supplier is limited to the development
of those facilities as provided in subdivision (12) (10) of this section;
(12) (10) Privately developed renewable energy generation facility means
and is limited to a facility that (a) generates electricity using solar, wind,
geothermal, biomass, landfill gas, or biogas, including all electrically
connected equipment used to produce, collect, and store the facility output up
to and including the transformer that steps up the voltage to sixty thousand
volts or greater, and including supporting structures, buildings, and roads,
unless otherwise agreed to in a joint transmission development agreement, (b)
is developed, constructed, and owned, in whole or in part, by one or more
private electric suppliers, and (c) is not wholly owned by a public power
district, a public power and irrigation district, a municipality, a registered
group of municipalities, an electric cooperative, an electric membership
-1-

LB43 LB43
2025 2025
association, any other governmental entity, or any combination thereof;
(13) (11) Regional transmission organization means an entity independent
from those entities generating or marketing electricity at wholesale or retail,
which has operational control over the electric transmission lines in a
designated geographic area in order to reduce constraints in the flow of
electricity and ensure that all power suppliers have open access to
transmission lines for the transmission of electricity;
(14) (12) Reliable or reliability means the ability of an electric
supplier to supply the aggregate electric power and energy requirements of its
electricity consumers in Nebraska at all times under normal operating
conditions, taking into account scheduled and unscheduled outages, including
sudden disturbances or unanticipated loss of system components that are to be
reasonably expected for any electric utility following prudent utility
practices, recognizing certain weather conditions and other contingencies may
cause outages at the distribution, transmission, and generation level;
(15) (13) Representative organization means an organization designated by
the board and organized for the purpose of providing joint planning and
encouraging maximum cooperation and coordination among electric suppliers. Such
organization shall represent electric suppliers owning a combined electric
generation plant accredited capacity of at least ninety percent of the total
electric generation plant accredited capacity constructed and in operation
within the state;
(16) (14) State means the State of Nebraska; and
(17) (15) Unbundled retail rates means the separation of utility bills
into the individual price components for which an electric supplier charges its
retail customers, including, but not limited to, the separate charges for the
generation, transmission, and distribution of electricity.
Sec. 2. Section 70-1012, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
70-1012 (1) Before any electric generation facilities or any transmission
lines or related facilities carrying more than seven hundred volts are
constructed or acquired by any supplier, an application, filed with the board
and containing such information as the board shall prescribe, shall be approved
by the board, except that such approval shall not be required (a) for the
construction or acquisition of a transmission line extension or related
facilities within a supplier's own service area or for the construction or
acquisition of a line not exceeding one-half mile outside its own service area
when all owners of electric lines located within one-half mile of the extension
consent thereto in writing and such consents are filed with the board, (b) for
any generation facility when the board finds that (i) such facility is being
constructed or acquired to replace a generating plant owned by an individual
municipality or registered group of municipalities with a capacity not greater
than that of the plant being replaced, (ii) such facility will generate less
than twenty-five thousand kilowatts of electric energy at rated capacity, and
(iii) the applicant will not use the plant or transmission capacity to supply
wholesale power to customers outside the applicant's existing retail service
area or chartered territory, (c) for acquisition of transmission lines or
related facilities, within the state, carrying one hundred fifteen thousand
volts or less, if the current owner of the transmission lines or related
facilities notifies the board of the lines or facilities involved in the
transaction and the parties to the transaction, or (d) for the construction of
a qualified facility as defined in section 70-2002.
(2)(a) Before any electric supplier commences construction of or acquires
an electric generation facility or transmission lines or related facilities
carrying more than seven hundred volts that will be or are located within a
ten-mile radius of a military installation, the owner of such proposed
facility, transmission lines, or related facilities shall provide written
notice certifying to the board that such facility or facilities contain no
electronic-related equipment or electronic-related materials, electronics, or
other components manufactured by any foreign government or foreign
nongovernment person determined to be a foreign adversary pursuant to 15 C.F.R.
7.4.
(b) Any electric supplier supplying, producing, or distributing
electricity within the state for sale at retail is exempt from subdivision (a)
of this subsection if it is in compliance with the critical infrastructure
protection requirements issued by the North American Electric Reliability
Corporation. To receive such exemption, the electric supplier shall submit
written notice to the board certifying that it is in such compliance. The
electric supplier shall also submit written notice to the board at any time
such supplier is no longer in such compliance.
(3)(a) Before any electric supplier not exempt from subdivision (2)(a) of
this section commences construction of or acquires an electric generation
facility or transmission lines or related facilities carrying more than seven
hundred volts that will be or are located within a ten-mile radius of a
military installation, the electric supplier shall, following consultation with
such supplier's vendors, submit a one-time written notice to the board
certifying that such facility or facilities continually contain no electronic-
related equipment or electronic-related components manufactured by any foreign
adversary.
(b) The electric supplier shall also submit written notice to the board at
any time such facility or facilities are no longer in compliance with the
certification provided under subdivision (a) of this subsection.
(4) Notwithstanding subsections (2) and (3) of this section, an electric
-2-

LB43 LB43
2025 2025
supplier required to provide certification under subsection (2) of this section
may use electronic-related equipment or electronic-related components
manufactured by a foreign adversary if the board preapproves the use of such
equipment or components after finding that:
(a) There is no other reasonable option for procuring such equipment or
components; and
(b) Not procuring or using such equipment or components would cause a
greater harm to the state or residents of the state than the harm associated
with the equipment or components.
(5) (3) A privately developed renewable energy generation facility is
exempt from this section if it complies with section 70-1014.02.
Sec. 3. Section 70-1014.02, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024,
is amended to read:
70-1014.02 (1) The Legislature finds that:
(a) Nebraska has the authority as a sovereign state to protect its land,
natural resources, and cultural resources for economic and aesthetic purposes
for the benefit of its residents and future generations by regulation of energy
generation projects;
(b) The unique terrain and ecology of the Nebraska Sandhills provide an
irreplaceable habitat for millions of migratory birds and other wildlife every
year and serve as the home to numerous ranchers and farmers;
(c) The grasslands of the Nebraska Sandhills and other natural resources
in Nebraska will become increasingly valuable, both economically and
strategically, as the demand for food and energy increases; and
(d) The Nebraska Sandhills are home to priceless archaeological sites of
historical and cultural significance to American Indians.
(2)(a) A privately developed renewable energy generation facility that
meets the requirements of this section is exempt from sections 70-1012 to
70-1014.01 if, no less than thirty days prior to the commencement of
construction, the owner of the facility:
(i) Notifies the board in writing of its intent to commence construction
of a privately developed renewable energy generation facility;
(ii) Certifies to the board that the facility will meet the requirements
for a privately developed renewable energy generation facility;
(iii) Certifies to the board that the private electric supplier will (A)
comply with any decommissioning requirements adopted by the local governmental
entities having jurisdiction over the privately developed renewable energy
generation facility and (B) except as otherwise provided in subdivision (c) (b)
of this subsection, submit a decommissioning plan to the board obligating the
private electric supplier to bear all costs of decommissioning the privately
developed renewable energy generation facility and requiring that the private
electric supplier post a security bond or other instrument, no later than the
sixth year following commercial operation, securing the costs of
decommissioning the facility and provide a copy of the bond or instrument to
the board;
(iv) Certifies to the board that the private electric supplier has entered
into or prior to commencing construction will enter into a joint transmission
development agreement pursuant to subdivision (d) (c) of this subsection with
the electric supplier owning the transmission facilities of sixty thousand
volts or greater to which the privately developed renewable energy generation
facility will interconnect;
(v) Certifies to the board that the private electric supplier has
consulted with the Game and Parks Commission to identify potential measures to
avoid, minimize, and mitigate impacts to species identified under subsection
(1) or (2) of section 37-806 during the project planning and design phases, if
possible, but in no event later than the commencement of construction; and
(vi) Certifies in writing to the board that the facility, if located
within a ten-mile radius of a military installation:
(A) Contains no materials, electronics, or other components manufactured
by any foreign government or foreign nongovernment person determined to be a
foreign adversary pursuant to 15 C.F.R. 7.4; or
(B) Is in compliance with the critical infrastructure protection
requirements issued by the North American Electric Reliability Corporation if
connected to the transmission grid at one hundred kilovolts or higher voltage
and has to have a nameplate rating of twenty megavolt amperes for a single
generation unit or injecting at an aggregate of seventy-five megavolt amperes
or greater. The private electric supplier shall also submit written notice to
the board at any time such private electric supplier is no longer in such
compliance; and
(vi) (vii) For a proposed privately developed renewable energy generation
facility that has a generating capacity that is greater than ten megawatts,
certifies to the board that the private electric supplier has held at least one
public meeting with advanced publicized notice in one of the counties in which
the proposed facility will be located at which (A) the private electric
supplier explains the need for the proposed facility and the type of facility
and (B) real property owners in any of the counties in which the proposed
facility will be located are provided an opportunity to comment on the proposed
facility. The private electric supplier shall provide a report to the board
containing the minutes of any such meeting and how many people commented on the
proposed facility. Documentation received at any such meeting shall be made
available to the board upon its request. A meeting described in this
subdivision is not subject to the requirements described in subdivision (3)(b)
(iv) of section 84-1411.
-3-

LB43 LB43
2025 2025
(b)(i) No less than thirty days prior to the commencement of construction
of a privately developed renewable energy generation facility located within a
ten-mile radius of a military installation, the owner of such facility shall:
(A) Provide written notice to the board under subdivision (2)(b)(ii)(A) of
this section; or
(B) Certify in writing to the board that the facility will, upon reaching
commercial operation, be in compliance with the critical infrastructure
protection requirements issued by the North American Electric Reliability
Corporation if such facility is connected to the transmission grid at one
hundred kilovolts or higher voltage and has a nameplate rating of twenty
megavolt amperes for a single generation unit or is injecting at an aggregate
of seventy-five megavolt amperes or greater. The owner of such facility shall
also submit written notice to the board at any time such facility is no longer
in compliance with such requirements.
(ii)(A) An owner of a facility choosing to proceed under subdivision (2)
(b)(i)(A) of this section shall, following consultation with such owner's
vendors, submit a one-time written notice to the board certifying that the
facility continually contains no electronic-related equipment or electronic-
related components manufactured by any foreign adversary.
(B) The owner shall also submit written notice to the board at any time
such facility is no longer in compliance with the certification provided under
subdivision (2)(b)(ii)(A) of this section.
(iii) Notwithstanding subdivisions (2)(b)(i) and (ii) of this section, the
owner of a facility required to provide the certification under subsection (2)
(b)(i) may use electronic-related equipment or electronic-related components
manufactured by a foreign adversary if the board preapproves the use of such
equipment or components after finding that:
(A) There is no other reasonable option for procuring such equipment or
components; and
(B) Not procuring or using such equipment or components would cause a
greater harm to the state than the harm associated with the equipment or
components.
(c) (b) The board may bring an action in the name of the State of Nebraska
for failure to comply with subdivision (a)(iii)(B) of this subsection, except
that such subdivision does not apply if a local government entity with the
authority to create requirements for decommissioning has enacted
decommissioning requirements for the applicable jurisdiction.
(d) (c) A joint transmission development agreement shall be entered into
to address construction, ownership, operation, and maintenance of such
additions or upgrades to the transmission facilities as required for the
privately developed renewable energy generation facility. The joint
transmission development agreement shall be negotiated and executed
contemporaneously with the generator interconnection agreement or other
directives of the applicable regional transmission organization with
jurisdiction over the addition or upgrade of transmission, upon terms
consistent with prudent electric utility practices for the interconnection of
renewable generation facilities, the electric supplier's reasonable
transmission interconnection requirements, and applicable transmission design
and construction standards. The electric supplier shall have the right to
purchase and own transmission facilities as set forth in the joint transmission
development agreement. The private electric supplier of the privately developed
renewable energy generation facility shall have the right to construct any
necessary facilities or improvements set forth in the joint transmission
development agreement pursuant to the standards set forth in the agreement at
the private electric supplier's cost.
(3) Within ten days after receipt of a written notice complying with
subsection (2) of this section, the executive director of the board shall issue
a written acknowledgment that the privately developed renewable energy
generation facility is exempt from sections 70-1012 to 70-1014.01 if such
facility remains in compliance with the requirements of this section.
(4) The exemption allowed under this section for a privately developed
renewable energy generation facility shall extend to and exempt all private
electric suppliers owning any interest in the facility, including any successor
private electric supplier which subsequently acquires any interest in the
facility.
(5) No property owned, used, or operated as part of a privately developed
renewable energy generation facility shall be subject to eminent domain by a
consumer-owned electric supplier operating in the State of Nebraska. Nothing in
this section shall be construed to grant the power of eminent domain to a
private electric supplier or limit the rights of any entity to acquire any
public, municipal, or utility right-of-way across property owned, used, or
operated as part of a privately developed renewable energy generation facility
as long as the right-of-way does not prevent the operation of or access to the
privately developed renewable energy generation facility.
(6) Only a consumer-owned electric supplier operating in the State of
Nebraska may exercise eminent domain authority to acquire the land rights
necessary for the construction of transmission lines and related facilities.
There is a rebuttable presumption that the exercise of eminent domain to
provide needed transmission lines and related facilities for a privately
developed renewable energy generation facility is a public use.
(7) Nothing in this section shall be construed to authorize a private
electric supplier to sell or deliver electricity at retail in Nebraska.
(8) Nothing in this section shall be construed to limit the authority of
-4-

LB43 LB43
2025 2025
or require a consumer-owned electric supplier operating in the State of
Nebraska to enter into a joint agreement with a private electric supplier to
develop, construct, and jointly own a privately developed renewable energy
generation facility.
Sec. 4. Section 70-1015, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
70-1015 (1) If any supplier violates Chapter 70, article 10, by either (a)
commencing the construction or finalizing or attempting to finalize the
acquisition of any generation facilities, any transmission lines, or any
related facilities without first providing notice or obtaining board approval,
whichever is required, or (b) serving or attempting to serve at retail any
customers located in Nebraska or any wholesale customers in violation of
section 70-1002.02, such construction, acquisition, or service of such
customers shall be enjoined in an action brought in the name of the State of
Nebraska until such supplier has complied with Chapter 70, article 10.
(2) If the executive director of the board determines that a private
electric supplier commenced construction of a privately developed renewable
energy generation facility less than thirty days prior to providing the notice
and certification required in subdivisions subdivision (2)(a) and (b) of
section 70-1014.02, the executive director shall send notice via certified mail
to the private electric supplier, informing it of the determination that the
private electric supplier is in violation of such subdivisions subdivision and
is subject to a fine in the amount of five hundred dollars. The private
electric supplier shall have twenty days from the date on which the notice is
received in which to submit the notice and certification described in such
subdivisions subdivision and to pay the fine. Within ten days after the private
electric supplier submits a notice and certification compliant with subsection
(2) of section 70-1014.02 and payment of the fine, the executive director of
the board shall issue the written acknowledgment described in subsection (3) of
section 70-1014.02. If the private electric supplier fails to submit a notice
and certification compliant with subsection (2) of section 70-1014.02 and pay
the fine within twenty days after the date on which the private electric
supplier receives the notice from the executive director of the board, the
private electric supplier shall immediately cease construction or operation of
the privately developed renewable energy generation facility.
(3) If the private electric supplier disputes that construction was
commenced less than thirty days prior to submitting the written notice and
certification required by subdivisions subdivision (2)(a) and (b) of section
70-1014.02, the private electric supplier may request a hearing before the
board. Such request shall be submitted within twenty days after the private
electric supplier receives the notice sent by the executive director pursuant
to subsection (2) of this section. If the private electric supplier does not
accept the certified mail sent pursuant to such subsection, the executive
director shall send a second notice to the private electric supplier by first-
class United States mail. The private electric supplier may submit a request
for hearing within twenty days after the date on which the second notice was
mailed.
(4) Upon receipt of a request for hearing, the board shall set a hearing
date. Such hearing shall be held within sixty days after such receipt. The
board shall provide to the private electric supplier written notice of the
hearing at least twenty days prior to the date of the hearing. The board or its
hearing officer may grant continuances upon good cause shown or upon the
request of the private electric supplier. Timely filing of a request for
hearing by a private electric supplier shall stay any further enforcement under
this section until the board issues an order pursuant to subsection (5) of this
section or the request for hearing is withdrawn.
(5) The board shall issue a written decision within sixty days after
conclusion of the hearing. All costs of the hearing shall be paid by the
private electric supplier if (a) the board determines that the private electric
supplier commenced construction of the privately developed renewable energy
generation facility less than thirty days prior to submitting the written
notice and certification required pursuant to subsection (2) of section
70-1014.02 or (b) the private electric supplier withdraws its request for
hearing prior to the board issuing its decision.
(6) A private electric supplier which the board finds to be in violation
of the requirements of subsection (2) of section 70-1014.02 shall either (a)
pay the fine described in this section and submit a notice and certification
compliant with subsection (2) of section 70-1014.02 or (b) immediately cease
construction or operation of the privately developed renewable energy
generation facility.
Sec. 5. Original sections 70-1001.01, 70-1012, 70-1014.02, and 70-1015,
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, are repealed.
Sec. 6. Since an emergency exists, this act takes effect when passed and
approved according to law.
-5-